District of Columbia statutes.
10-501.03

Furnishing to buildings in Judiciary Square.

The Secretary of the Interior, through the National Park Service, is authorized to furnish steam from the Central Heating Plant to such buildings as may be erected by the District of Columbia on the property bounded by 4th and 5th Streets, and D and G Streets, Northwest, in the District of Columbia, and known as Judiciary Square; provided, that the District of Columbia agrees to pay for the steam furnished at reasonable rates, not less than cost, as may be determined by the Secretary of the Interior; and provided further, that the District of Columbia agrees to provide all necessary connections with the government mains at its own expense, and in a manner satisfactory to the Secretary of the Interior.

Apr. 27, 1937, 50 Stat. 95, ch. 136
1981 Ed., § 9-103.
1973 Ed., § 9-103.